Washington statutes.
RCW 9.91.155

Tree spiking—Action for damages.

Any person who is damaged by any act prohibited in RCW 9.91.150 may bring a civil action to recover damages sustained, including a reasonable attorney's fee. A party seeking civil damages under this section may recover upon proof of a violation of the provisions of RCW 9.91.150 by a preponderance of the evidence.

[ 1988 c 224 s 2.]